data/lexd/41-participles.lexd
LEXICON InflVp_P29_decl
<PrsPrc><Msc><Sg><Nom>:s
<PrsPrc><Msc><Sg><Gen>:is
<PrsPrc><Msc><Sg><Dat>:S·ismu
<PrsPrc><Msc><Sg><Acc>:·in
<PrsPrc><Msc><Pl><Nom>:·ei
<PrsPrc><Msc><Pl><Gen>:·in
<PrsPrc><Msc><Pl><Dat>:·immans
<PrsPrc><Msc><Pl><Acc>:·ins

LEXICON InflVp_P68_decl
<PstPrc><Msc><Sg><Nom>:·uns
<PstPrc><Msc><Sg><Gen>:·ušas
<PstPrc><Msc><Sg><Dat>:·ušasmu
<PstPrc><Msc><Sg><Acc>:·usin
<PstPrc><Msc><Pl><Nom>:·usis
<PstPrc><Msc><Pl><Gen>:·usin
<PstPrc><Msc><Pl><Dat>:·usimans
<PstPrc><Msc><Pl><Acc>:·usins

LEXICON InflVp_P69_decl
<PssPrc><Msc><Sg><Nom>:s
<PssPrc><Msc><Sg><Gen>:·as
<PssPrc><Msc><Sg><Dat>:S·asmu
<PssPrc><Msc><Sg><Acc>:·an
<PssPrc><Msc><Pl><Nom>:S·āi
<PssPrc><Msc><Pl><Gen>:·an
<PssPrc><Msc><Pl><Dat>:S·ammans
<PssPrc><Msc><Pl><Acc>:·ans
